Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.52, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Application procedure for visiting patients. new text end new text begin (a) The office shall establish an alternative certification procedure for visiting patients to enroll in the patient registry program. new text end new text begin (b) The office may request that a visiting patient who is seeking to enroll in the registry program submit to the office a copy of the visiting patient's medical cannabis registration, license, or other confirmation of patient status in their state of residence, including the patient's expiration date and a verification of the visiting patient's residency in the state where they have a medical cannabis authorization. new text end new text begin (c) Once a visiting patient's registration is approved, the patient has all of the rights and privileges of a medical cannabis patient under this chapter. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.52, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Enrollment; denial of enrollment; revocation. (a) Within 30 days after the receipt of an application and deleted text begin certification or other documentation of a diagnosis with a qualifying medical conditiondeleted text end new text begin the required documentationnew text end , the office must approve or deny a patient's enrollment in the registry program. If the office approves a patient's enrollment in the registry program, the office must provide notice to the patient and to the patient's health care practitionernew text begin , if applicablenew text end . (b) The office may deny a patient's enrollment in the registry program only if the patient: (1) does not submit a certification from a health care practitioner or, if the patient is a veteran, the documentation requested by the office under subdivision 3new text begin , or if the patient is a visiting patient, the documentation requested by the office under subdivision 3anew text end ; (2) has not signed the disclosure required in subdivision 2; (3) does not provide the information required by the office; (4) provided false information on the application; or (5) at the time of application, is also enrolled in a federally approved clinical trial for the treatment of a qualifying medical condition with medical cannabis. (c) If the office denies a patient's enrollment in the registry program, the office must provide written notice to a patient of all reasons for denying enrollment. Denial of enrollment in the registry program is considered a final decision of the office and is subject to judicial review under chapter 14. (d) The office may revoke a patient's enrollment in the registry program only: (1) pursuant to subdivision 2, paragraph (c); (2) upon the death of the patient; (3) if the patient's certifying health care practitioner has filed a declaration under subdivision 2, paragraph (c), that the patient's qualifying diagnosis no longer exists and the patient does not submit another certification within 30 days; (4) if the patient does not comply with subdivision 6; or (5) if the patient intentionally sells or diverts medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products in violation of this chapter. (e) If the office has revoked a patient's enrollment in the registry program due to a violation of subdivision 6, the patient may apply for enrollment 12 months after the date on which the patient's enrollment was revoked. The office must process such an application in accordance with this subdivision. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.52, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Conditions of continued enrollment. new text begin (a) Unless the patient is a visiting patient, new text end as conditions of continued enrollment, a patient must: (1) continue to receive regularly scheduled treatment for the patient's qualifying medical condition from the patient's health care practitioner; and (2) report changes in the patient's qualifying medical condition to the patient's health care practitioner. new text begin (b) If the patient is a visiting patient under subdivision 3a, as conditions of continued enrollment, a patient must: new text end new text begin (1) maintain patient certification within the patient's state of residency; and new text end new text begin (2) report any changes to their patient certification from their state of residence. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.52, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Enrollment period. new text begin (a) new text end Enrollment in the registry program new text begin under subdivisions 2 and 3 new text end is valid for three years. To re-enroll, a patient must submit the information required in subdivision 2 and a patient who is also a veteran must submit the information required in subdivision 3. new text begin (b) Enrollment in the registry program under subdivision 3a is valid until expiration of the patient's certification in their state of residency. new text end